District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
20 That this bill may be cited as the "Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority
21 Stadium-Armory Station Improvements Fiscal Year 2026 to Fiscal Year 2030
22 Reimbursable Agreement Emergency Act of2026".
23 Sec. 2. (a) Pursuant to section 451(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
24 approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code§ 1-204.51(c)(3)), the
25 Council approves the multiyear Reimbursable Agreement for more than $1 million with
26 the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority to design and construct station
27 improvements at the Stadium-Armory Metrorail Station. The Mayor submitted on
28 September XX, 2026 a reimbursable agreement with the Washington Metropolitan Area
29 Transit Authority ("WMAT A") to perform station improvements at the street, mezzanine,
30 and platform levels of the station.
31 (b) The Council approves the maximum total expenditure under this multiyear
32 contract with WMATA in the amount of Three Hundred Million dollars ($300,000,000).

33 Sec. 3. The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement provided by the Chief
34 Financial Officer as the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General
35 Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C.
36 Official Code § 1-301.47a).
37 Sec. 4. This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event
38 of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect
39 for no longer than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of
40 Columbia in section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
41 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 14, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
Authority Stadium-Armory Station Improvements Reimbursable
Agreement Emergency Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Introduction as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on
September 2, 2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 budget and the fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The District’s revised fiscal year 2026 and fiscal
year 2027 through fiscal year 2032 capital improvements plan includes $300 million to support the
multiyear reimbursable agreement between the District and the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority (WMATA) approved by the bill.
Background
In 2025, the District and the Washington Commanders football team reached an agreement for the
Commanders to return to a stadium in the District for the team’s home games and act as a catalyst
for ancillary development under the Robert F. Kennedy Campus Master Plan. In addition to the
stadium construction and residential, retail, and commercial developments surrounding the stadium,
significant transportation improvements are required to support the stadium and development.
In July 2026, the WMATA Board of Directors authorized the WMATA General Manager to enter into
a multiyear reimbursable agreement with the District to support the design and construction of
improvements to the Stadium-Armory Metro Station. Subsequently, the District and WMATA agreed
WMATA would lead the planning, community engagement, design, construction, testing, and
commissioning of the project with resources provided by the District. The agreement establishes a
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Stadium-Armory Improvements Reimbursable
Agreement Emergency Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September 2,
2026
project schedule beginning in the summer of 2026 and ending with construction completion in the
spring of 2030. Under the agreement, WMATA will improve passageways and faregates, enhance
entrances with new stairs and elevators, and improve the station’s mezzanine levels.1
The bill approves the multiyear reimbursable agreement between the District and WMATA and
approves the maximum of $300 million included in the capital budget to be expended on the
agreement.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 budget and fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The revised fiscal year 2026 capital plan and
the fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year 2032 capital improvements plan includes $300 million to
support the agreement with WMATA to execute the improvements to the Stadium-Armory Metro
Station that are necessary to support development in the area, including the stadium itself. The $300
million is available over fiscal years 2026 through fiscal year 2029, to align with construction
completion in early 2030. The bill’s approval will allow the Mayor and the Director of the District
Department of Transportation to execute the multiyear reimbursable agreement with WMATA.
1 Separate from the agreement and with WMATA funding, WMATA will replace all eight escalators at the
station and one of the station’s elevators.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 11, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Certification of the “Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
Authority Stadium-Armory Station Improvements Fiscal Year 2027 to Fiscal Year
2031 Reimbursable Agreement Emergency Act of 2026” and the “Fiscal Year 2027 to
Fiscal Year 2031 Reimbursable Agreement with the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority Stadium-Armory Station Improvements Approval and Payment
Authorization Emergency Declaration Resolution of 2026”
(AE-26-444)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov